Utah statutes.
49-11-302.   Board duties with respect to fund.
(1)  The board:
(a)  shall review and establish the asset allocation of the Utah State
Retirement Investment Fund for investment, and with the executive director,
shall determine the method of investing the funds;
(b)  through the executive director:
(i)  shall invest the money in the Utah State Retirement Investment Fund; and
(ii)  may provide for the holding, purchasing, selling, assigning,
transferring, and disposing of any of the securities and investments in which
any of the money of the Utah
State Retirement Investment Fund is invested.
(2)  Fees for all services shall be paid from the interest earnings of the
Utah State Retirement Investment Fund.
(3) Title to real estate or any other fund investment may be:
(a)  held in the name of the Utah State Retirement Investment Fund; or
(b)  held in another name or names as determined by the board.
